Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-525
Organized retail crime; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 28-525 to 28-527:

(1) Aggregated retail market value means the total combined value of all retail merchandise involved in a transaction, series of transactions, occurrence, series of occurrences, or course of conduct which constitutes a violation of section 28-526. Such value shall be calculated based on the price at which the retail merchandise would ordinarily be sold by a retailer in the ordinary course of business. If the value cannot be reasonably ascertained in such manner, the value shall be calculated based on the cost of replacing the retail merchandise within a reasonable period after a violation of this section;

(2) Organized retail crime means the theft of retail merchandise with the intent or purpose of:

(a) Reselling, distributing, or otherwise reentering the retail merchandise in commerce; or

(b) Transferring the stolen retail merchandise to another retailer or to any other person in exchange for anything of value;

(3) Retail commerce means the sale of articles, products, commodities, items, or components to the public for use or consumption rather than for resale;

(4) Retail merchandise means any article, product, commodity, item, or component intended to be sold in retail commerce; and

(5) Retailer means a person that sells or facilitates the sale of retail merchandise.

Laws 2025, LB559, § 7.